Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB301.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.6. Price Disclosure.--(a) For every prescription medication that a consumer intends to purchase, a pharmacy or an authorized employe of the pharmacy shall, upon request, disclose the following:(1) The current pharmacy retail price of the brand-name drug and any generically equivalent drug available at the pharmacy, where applicable.(2) The consumer's cost-sharing amount of the brand-name drug and any generically equivalent drug available at the 1234567891011121314151617181920 pharmacy, where applicable.(3) Information on where to apply for subsidized health coverage through the Commonwealth's official health insurance exchange, using materials developed by the exchange authority, which shall be made available on the exchange authority's publicly accessible Internet website and shared with the board.(4) A disclaimer, which shall be included with the information required under this section. The disclaimer shall state: "A consumer's health care choices, including whether a particular on-exchange health insurance policy is appropriate for the consumer, should not be based solely on the information provided, but should instead be considered in connection with the consumer's other health care and financial circumstances."(b) A pharmacy shall be required to keep an electronic or paper copy of this section, including any rules and regulations issued under this section, on file. A pharmacy shall post in a conspicuous manner at all locations where prescription medications are sold a notice informing the consumer of the right to request disclosures provided for under this section. The board shall notify each pharmacy of any change to this section and any change to rules and regulations issued under this section. A pharmacy shall have thirty days to update the copy and notice from the date the pharmacy was notified by the board of a change. The board shall furnish each pharmacy with a copy of this section, any rules and regulations issued under this section and the notice as required under this subsection.(c) The notice and disclosure required under subsection (b) shall be presented in a manner that is simple and easy to understand.(d) A pharmacy that fails to comply with the requirements of 20250SB0301PN0235 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section shall be guilty of a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).(e) The board, in consultation with the exchange authority and Insurance Department, as appropriate, shall adopt rules and regulations as necessary to carry out and enforce this section.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:(1) "Cost-sharing amount" means the amount owed by a policyholder under the terms of the policyholder's health insurance policy or as required by a pharmacy benefits manager.(2) "Exchange authority" means the Pennsylvania Health Insurance Exchange Authority established under 40 Pa.C.S. § 9302 (relating to Pennsylvania Health Insurance Exchange Authority).(3) "Generically equivalent drug" means the term as defined under section 2 of the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1163, No.259), referred to as the Generic Equivalent Drug Law.(4) "Health insurance policy" means the term as defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 9103 (relating to definitions).(5) "On-exchange health insurance policy" means a health insurance policy offered for purchase through the health insurance exchange of the Commonwealth operated by the exchange authority.(6) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means the term as defined under section 103 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the "Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."(7) "Pharmacy retail price" means the price that an individual without prescription drug coverage or not using any 20250SB0301PN0235 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other prescription medication benefit or discount would pay at a retail pharmacy, not including a pharmacist dispensing fee.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:Section 9.6(e) and (f) of this act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in one year.20250SB0301PN0235 - 4 - 12345678